Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 4

DOMESTIC
INSURERS

PART I.
ORGANIZATION, POWERS AND SALE OF SECURITIES OF

DOMESTIC
INSURERS

§431:4-101 Definitions. As used in
this article:

(1) Surplus funds means the excess of the insurer's
assets over its liabilities, including its capital stock as a liability.

(2) Available surplus means the excess over the
minimum amount of surplus required for the classes of insurance the insurer is
authorized to transact.

(3) Equity security means any stock or similar
security; any security convertible, with or without consideration, into such a
security, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase such a
security; any such warrant or right; or any security which the commissioner by
such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe in the public
interest or for the protection of investors designate as an equity security. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next